District of Columbia statutes.
6-1062.06

Development of conceptual plan.

The Council directs the Mayor through the appropriate agencies working with the Developer, the affected community (Ward 5), and the landowners and renters of the Capital City Market to develop a Final Conceptual Plan and an Agreement between the District and the Developer within 180 days of March 14, 2007. Once the Final Conceptual Plan and the Agreement have received affirmative written approval from property owners representing 50% or more of the site of the Capital City Market, the Mayor shall submit the Final Conceptual Plan and Agreement to the Council for approval within 30 days of such affirmative written approval.

Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-278, § 206, 54 DCR 895